test/src/morphology/N-xo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - хо: # Noun 'birch' - full paradigm /Type 1/
     хо+N+Sg+Nom: хо
     хо+N+Sg+Acc: хомʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Gen: хоʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Dat: хонʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Loc: хохона
     хо+N+Sg+Abl: хоход
     хо+N+Sg+Pros: ховна
     хо+N+Du+Nom: хохоʼ
     хо+N+Du+Acc: хохоʼ
     хо+N+Du+Gen: хохоʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Nom: хоˮ
     хо+N+Pl+Acc: хо
     хо+N+Pl+Gen: хоˮ
     хо+N+Pl+Dat: хохоˮ
     хо+N+Pl+Loc: хохоˮна
     хо+N+Pl+Abl: хохот
     хо+N+Pl+Pros: хоˮомна
     
     хо+N+Tra: хоӈэ
     хо+N+Car: хосиˮ
     хо+N+Equ: ходремʼ
     хо+N+Equ+Lat: ходревʼ

# Possessive forms 
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: хов 
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: хор  
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: хода 
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: хомиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: хориʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ходиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ховаˮ
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: хораˮ
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ходоʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: хов   
     хо+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: хоми  
     хо+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: хомд  
     хо+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: хомда 
     хо+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: хомиʼ 
     хо+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: хомдиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: хомдиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ховаˮ 
     хо+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: хомдаˮ
     хо+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: хомдоʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: хон   
     хо+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: хони  
     хо+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: хонд  
     хо+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: хонда 
     хо+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: хониʼ 
     хо+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: хондиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: хондиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: хонаˮ 
     хо+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: хондаˮ
     хо+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: хондоʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: хохон   
     хо+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: хохони  
     хо+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: хохонд  
     хо+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: хохонда 
     хо+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: хохониʼ 
     хо+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: хохондиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: хохондиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: хохонаˮ 
     хо+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: хохондаˮ
     хо+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: хохондоʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: хохонан   
     хо+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: хохонани  
     хо+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: хохонанд  
     хо+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: хохонанда 
     хо+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: хохонаниʼ 
     хо+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: хохонандиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: хохонандиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: хохонанаˮ 
     хо+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: хохонандаˮ
     хо+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: хохонандоʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: хоходан   
     хо+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: хоходани  
     хо+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: хоходанд  
     хо+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: хоходанда 
     хо+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: хоходаниʼ 
     хо+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: хоходандиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: хоходандиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: хоходанаˮ 
     хо+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: хоходандаˮ
     хо+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: хоходандоʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: ховнан   
     хо+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: ховнани  
     хо+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ховнанд  
     хо+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ховнанда 
     хо+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ховнаниʼ 
     хо+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ховнандиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ховнандиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ховнанаˮ 
     хо+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ховнандаˮ
     хо+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ховнандоʼ
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: хохоюн  
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: хохоюд  
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: хохоюда 
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: хохоюниʼ
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: хохоюдиʼ
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: хохоюдиʼ
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: хохоюнаˮ
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: хохоюдаˮ
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: хохоюдоʼ
     хо+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: хохоюн  
     хо+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: хохоюд  
     хо+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: хохоюда 
     хо+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: хохоюниʼ
     хо+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: хохоюдиʼ
     хо+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: хохоюдиʼ
     хо+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: хохоюнаˮ
     хо+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: хохоюдаˮ
     хо+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: хохоюдоʼ
     хо+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: хохоюн  
     хо+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: хохоют  
     хо+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: хохоюта 
     хо+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: хохоюниʼ
     хо+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: хохоютиʼ
     хо+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: хохоютиʼ
     хо+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: хохоюнаˮ
     хо+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: хохоютаˮ
     хо+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: хохоютоʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: хон   
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ход   
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: хода  
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: хониʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ходиʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ходиʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: хонаˮ 
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ходаˮ 
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ходоʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: хон   
     хо+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ход   
     хо+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: хода  
     хо+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: хониʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ходиʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ходиʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: хонаˮ 
     хо+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ходаˮ 
     хо+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ходоʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: хоˮон  
     хо+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: хот   
     хо+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: хота  
     хо+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: хоˮниʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: хотиʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: хотиʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: хоˮнаˮ 
     хо+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: хотаˮ 
     хо+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: хотоʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: хохоˮн 
     хо+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: хохот 
     хо+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: хохота 
     хо+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: хохоˮниʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: хохотиʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: хохотиʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: хохоˮнаˮ 
     хо+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: хохотаˮ 
     хо+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: хохотоʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: хохоˮнан  
     хо+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: хохоˮнат  
     хо+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: хохоˮната 
     хо+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: хохоˮнаниʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: хохоˮнатиʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: хохоˮнатиʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: хохоˮнанаˮ
     хо+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: хохоˮнатаˮ
     хо+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: хохоˮнатоʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: хохотан 
     хо+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: хохотат 
     хо+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: хохотата 
     хо+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: хохотаниʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: хохотатиʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: хохотатиʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: хохотанаˮ
     хо+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: хохотатаˮ
     хо+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: хохотатоʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: хоˮманан  
     хо+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: хоˮманат  
     хо+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: хоˮманата 
     хо+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: хоˮмананиʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: хоˮманатиʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: хоˮманатиʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: хоˮмананаˮ
     хо+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: хоˮманатаˮ
     хо+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: хоˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative

     хо+N+Pred+Abs: ход 
     хо+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: ходав 
     хо+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: ходар  
     хо+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: ходада 
     хо+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: ходав
     хо+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: ходамд
     хо+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: ходамда
     хо+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: ходан
     хо+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ходанд
     хо+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: ходанда
     хо+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: ходамиʼ
     хо+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: ходариʼ
     хо+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: ходадиʼ
     хо+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: ходамиʼ
     хо+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: ходамдиʼ
     хо+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: ходамдиʼ
     хо+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: ходаниʼ
     хо+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: ходандиʼ
     хо+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: ходандиʼ
     хо+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: ходаваˮ
     хо+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: ходараˮ
     хо+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: ходадоʼ
     хо+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: ходаваˮ
     хо+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: ходамдаˮ
     хо+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: ходамдоʼ
     хо+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: ходанаˮ
     хо+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: ходандаˮ
     хо+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: ходандоʼ
     
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: [ходмʼ, хомʼ]
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хон  
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хо   
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: хониʼ
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ходиʼ
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хохоʼ
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ховаˮ
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ходаˮ
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хоˮ  
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: [ходамзь, хоманзь]
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: хонась 
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хось   
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: хонинзь
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ходинзь
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хохонзь
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ховаць 
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ходаць 
     хо+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хоць   
                    
# Predicative Possessive forms 

     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хов 
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хор  
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хода
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хомиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хориʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ходиʼ
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ховаˮ
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хораˮ
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ходоʼ
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хохоюн  
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хохоюд  
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хохоюда 
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хохоюниʼ
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хохоюдиʼ
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хохоюдиʼ
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хохоюнаˮ
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хохоюдаˮ
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хохоюдоʼ
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хон   
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ход   
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хода  
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хониʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ходиʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ходиʼ 
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хонаˮ 
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ходаˮ 
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ходоʼ 
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ховась
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хорась
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ходась
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хоминзь
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хоринзь
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ходинзь
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ховаць
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хораць
     хо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ходонзь
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хохоюнась
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хохоюдась
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хохоюдась
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хохоюнинзь
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хохоюдинзь
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хохоюдинзь
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хохоюнаць
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хохоюдаць
     хо+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хохоюдонзь
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хонась
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ходась
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ходась
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хонинзь
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ходинзь
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ходинзь
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хонаць
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ходаць
     хо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ходонзь
